Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.800

Opioid drug prescribing rules—Adoption. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) By January 1, 2019, the *commission must adopt rules establishing requirements for prescribing opioid drugs. The rules may contain exemptions based on education, training, amount of opioids prescribed, patient panel, and practice environment.

(2) In developing the rules, the *commission must consider the agency medical directors' group and centers for disease control guidelines, and may consult with the department of health, the University of Washington, and the largest professional associations for advanced registered nurse practitioners and certified registered nurse anesthetists in the state.

[2017 c 297 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Findings—Intent—2017 c 297: See note following RCW 18.22.800.

PDFRCW 18.79.800

Opioid drug prescribing rules—Adoption. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) By January 1, 2019, the board must adopt rules establishing requirements for prescribing opioid drugs. The rules may contain exemptions based on education, training, amount of opioids prescribed, patient panel, and practice environment.

(2) In developing the rules, the board must consider the agency medical directors' group and centers for disease control guidelines, and may consult with the department of health, the University of Washington, and the largest professional associations for advanced practice registered nurses and certified registered nurse anesthetists in the state.

[2024 c 239 s 19; 2017 c 297 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Findings—Intent—2017 c 297: See note following RCW 18.22.800.